Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7427
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-7427 to 71-7463 shall be known and may be cited as the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7401;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1293.